Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1255.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303(a) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--(a) The classes of income referred to above are as follows:* * *(9) Tips excluded under section 303.1 shall not be included in compensation for the purposes of calculating taxable income.12345678910111213141516171819202122 * * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 303.1. Exclusion of Tips from Taxable Income.--(a) For purposes of the tax imposed under this article, taxable income shall not include any tip, gratuity or voluntary payment received by an individual in the course of employment, whether received in cash, electronically or by any other method.(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the reclassification of wages, service charges or employer-mandated fees as tips for the purpose of avoiding taxation.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Tip." A voluntary payment made by a customer to an employe or distributed to an employe through a tip-sharing arrangement. The term does not include any payment that the employer is mandated to pay as part of the employe's base wage.Section 3. The Department of Revenue shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this act, including procedures to prevent fraud, misclassification or improper reporting of wages as tips.Section 4. This act shall apply to the next fiscal year following the effective date of this section.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1255PN1549 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324